Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Sexual Assault
§ 6-2-304.
Sexual assault in the third degree.

An actor commits sexual assault in the third degree if, under circumstances not constituting sexual assault in the first or second degree:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 159 § 3.

The actor subjects a victim to sexual contact under any of the circumstances of W.S. 6-2-302(a)(i) through (iv) or 6-2-303(a)(i) through (vii) and (ix) without inflicting sexual intrusion on the victim and without causing serious bodily injury to the victim.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1984, ch. 44, § 2; 1997, ch. 135, § 1; 2007, ch. 159, § 3; 2009, ch. 87, § 1; 2017 ch. 199, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to sexual battery, see §

6-2-313

.

As to assault upon child under 16, see §

6-2-503

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former (a)(i) and (a)(ii), which pertained to the age of the actor and victim.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “(viii)” for “(vi)” following “6-2-303(a)(i) through” in (a)(iii).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(iii) added “and (ix)” preceding “without inflicting.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section not unconstitutionally overbroad.—

Defendant’s conviction for sexual contact with a resident of a correctional facility did not violate her due process rights under either the state or federal constitutions because the statutes at issue clearly proscribed her conduct, the State had an undeniable interest in ensuring the relationship of state prisoners and the state officers who supervised their confinement was not undermined by sexual contact, consensual or otherwise, and, although defendant raised the Wyoming constitutional argument below and on appeal, her argument largely echoed her argument under the federal constitution and she provided no analysis of any of the requisite factors or legal reasons justifying resort to independent state grounds. Sheesley v. State, 2019 WY 32, 437 P.3d 830,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2019).

Construction with other law. —

The legislature intended criminal liability under former W.S. §

14-3-105

to entail conduct which is more culpable than the conduct which constitutes guilt under this section. Pierson v. State, 956 P.2d 1119,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. Apr. 22, 1998).

The indecent liberties statute as applied to the facts of defendant's case was not unconstitutionally vague. The statutory language provided sufficient notice that consensual intercourse with a 16 year-old is criminal behavior even though that conduct does not offend the third degree sexual assault statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-304(a)(i) (repealed), because of the extreme age difference (defendant was 34) and the fact that consent of a minor is not a complete defense to the charge of taking indecent liberties. Moe v. State, 2005 WY 58, 110 P.3d 1206,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. June 29, 2005).

Section not unconstitutionally vague. —

Inasmuch as this section gives a man of ordinary intelligence fair notice that his contemplated conduct will fall within that forbidden by this section, it is not unconstitutionally vague. Sears v. State, 632 P.2d 946,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1981).

Child witness. —

Defendant's conviction of second-degree sexual assault, third degree sexual assault, and indecent liberties with a minor was upheld where the trial court held a hearing to determine the competency of the five-year old child victim to testify as to the sexual assault; no separate taint hearing was required because defendant did not come forward with some evidence that taint was present, and competency inquiry, the five-part test to determine the competency of child witnesses, included the question of pretrial taint. Morganflash v. State, 2003 WY 120, 76 P.3d 830,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2003).

District court did not err in ruling that an 8-year-old sexual assault victim was competent to testify at trial against defendant. Although the district court recognized her testimony was not perfect, on the whole, the child seemed to understand her obligation to tell the truth and although she may not have been a particularly effective witness because she occasionally did not follow the line of questioning, she had the mental capacity to receive an accurate impression of the charged events and a memory sufficient to retain an independent recollection of those events. Sisneros v. State, 2005 WY 139, 121 P.3d 790,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. Nov. 15, 2005).

Section not applicable when age difference not met. —

The defendant's actions did not constitute a crime under this section because the defendant was less than four years older than his victim. Lovato v. State, 901 P.2d 408,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1995).

Section applied to chiropractor's conduct with patients. —

Where patients testified that they were victims of a chiropractor who touched their breasts and pubic areas and made inappropriate remarks during chiropractic treatment, the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that the evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction for ten counts of third degree sexual assault in violation of this section because he was in a position of authority over his patients. While not engaged in the practice of medicine, chiropractors governed themselves by ethical codes advising practitioners not to take physical advantage of any patient.
Faubion v. State, 2010 WY 79, 233 P.3d 926,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2010).

Consent as a defense. —

The consent of the minor is not a complete defense to the charge of taking indecent liberties. Pierson v. State, 956 P.2d 1119,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. Apr. 22, 1998).

Sentence for both attempt, completed crime, unconstitutional. —

Where a defendant was convicted and sentenced for both attempted sexual assault in the third degree and completed sexual assault in the third degree, entry of judgment on both charges was barred by double jeopardy. A person may not be convicted and sentenced for both the attempt and the completed crime. Craney v. State, 798 P.2d 1202,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1990).

Sentence was lenient. —

Defendant's sentence on two counts of third-degree sexual assault of two concurrent prison terms of 4 to 5 years was upheld as remarkably lenient, where defendant admitted to engaging in a sexual relationship with two 14-year-old girls, had used his position as a teacher to establish a trusting relationship with them and then sexually abused them; fact that he had escaped detection for over 30 years did not diminish in any way his heinous criminal conduct. Monjaras v. State, 2006 WY 71, 136 P.3d 162,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2006).

Sentence upheld. —

Sentence of 17 to 25 years in a case where guilty pleas were entered to third-degree sexual assault and one count of immodest, immoral, or indecent acts with a minor was not disproportionate to the crimes where defendant was accused of touching teenage girls inappropriately for his own sexual gratification; moreover, he was acting like a sexual predator when he groomed the girls.
Hubbard v. State, 2008 WY 12, 175 P.3d 625,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2008).

When defendant was convicted of third-degree sexual assault and incest, the two offenses had different elements and did not merge for purposes of sentencing.
Najera v. State, 2009 WY 105, 214 P.3d 990,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2009), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Third-degree sexual assault not lesser included offense. —

It was plain error for the trial judge to instruct the jury that third-degree sexual assault is a lesser included offense of first-degree sexual assault. Third-degree sexual assault cannot be a lesser included offense to first-degree sexual assault because its elements are not contained within the set of elements for first-degree sexual assault. Craney v. State, 798 P.2d 1202,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1990).

Double jeopardy.—

After defendant was acquitted of first- and second-degree sexual assault, and a jury hung as to third-degree sexual assault, a retrial on third-degree sexual assault did not violate double jeopardy because a bill of particulars included conduct other than cunnilingus for which defendant was acquitted, which the crime excluded. Cercy v. State, 2019 WY 131, 455 P.3d 678,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2019).

Lesser-included offense instructions not required. —

The manner of committing sexual assault in the second degree and sexual assault in the third degree not only is differentiated under the statutory language, but obviously these offenses can be committed by acts or conduct different from that proscribed by the statute forbidding sexual assault in the first degree. Because of this, every element of the claimed lesser included offenses of sexual assault in the second degree and sexual assault in the third degree was not necessarily encompassed within the commission of the greater offense of sexual assault in the first degree, and the lesser included offense instructions were not required. Also, with respect to the claimed lesser included offense of sexual assault in the third degree, the evidence justified a conclusion of penetration or nothing and an instruction relating to “sexual contact” would not have been appropriate. Seeley v. State, 715 P.2d 232,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 503

(Wyo. 1986).

Although an appellate court did not decide whether sexual battery was a lesser-included offense of first-degree sexual assault and third-degree sexual assault, a trial court did not err by refusing to give a lesser-included offense instruction because the defendant admitted that sexual contact had occurred and the theory of the defense, consent, only allowed a jury to find defendant guilty or not guilty of the greater offense. Dean v. State, 2003 WY 128, 77 P.3d 692,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2003).

Improper jury instruction was harmless error. —

In defendant's prosecution for third-degree sexual assault, a violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-304

the district court erred when it instructed the jury on a statutory defense to the crime defined in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-104

(repealed), but the error was harmless because (1) the jury did receive an instruction that it was an affirmative defense to third-degree sexual assault if defendant believed that the victim was over 16 years of age, which instruction was based upon Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-308(a)
and applied to third-degree sexual assault; (2) the jury was instructed that the elements of third-degree sexual assault had to be proved beyond a reasonable doubt, that consent of a victim under the age of 16 was not a defense, and that a reasonable belief that the victim was 16 or older was a defense; (3) while facts concerning consent were presented to the jury by both sides, the case did not turn on that question, but rather, the case turned upon the question of whether defendant reasonably believed that the victim was 16 years old; and (4) a correct instruction that consent was no defense could have been, and should have been, given.
Phillips v. State, 2007 WY 25, 151 P.3d 1131,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2007).

Prosecutorial misconduct was harmless error. —

Prosecutor's misconduct in referring to defendant as a pedophile during rebuttal closing argument in a prosecution charging defendant with third-degree sexual assault, a violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-304

, was harmless error under Wyo. R. App. P. 9.04 because defendant had admitted to having sexual intercourse with the victim, and given the evidence at trial regarding whether he knew her age at the time, which was the only real issue at trial, it was doubtful that the prosecutor's use of the word “pedophile” affected the outcome of the case.
Phillips v. State, 2007 WY 25, 151 P.3d 1131,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2007).

Evidence sufficient to convict. —

See Trujillo v. State, 880 P.2d 575,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1994).

Defendant was convicted of two counts of third-degree sexual assault under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-304(a)(ii) involving his 10-year-old daughter based upon his daughter's testimony that defendant “massaged” her by touching her legs, arms, breasts, buttocks, and genitals; on appeal, the court rejected defendant's argument that the evidence was insufficient to support his conviction because it failed to establish the necessary element that, in touching his daughter, he acted with the intent of sexual arousal, gratification, or abuse as defined in
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-301(a)(vi). An oral express of intent was not required; rather, intent of sexual gratification could be inferred from defendant's touching of the victim on more than one occasion and his commission of the acts when alone with the victim.
Trumbull v. State, 2009 WY 103, 214 P.3d 978,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 2009).

Where the evidence showed that defendant abducted a victim at gunpoint, handcuffed the victim inside of a car, committed nonconsensual sexual acts upon the victim, and transported the victim without consent, there was sufficient evidence to convict defendant of kidnapping, first-degree sexual assault, and third-degree sexual assault. Dean v. State, 2003 WY 128, 77 P.3d 692,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2003).

Defendant's convictions for third-degree sexual assault, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-304(a), were supported by the evidence because the victim testified that defendant, a certified nursing assistant, massaged the tip of his penis in a circular motion with his thumb while he was bathing him; defendant also quit wearing gloves and began contacting the victim's penis with his bare hands.
Baldes v. State, 2012 WY 67, 267 P.3d 386,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(May 15, 2012).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of third degree sexual assault and intentional abuse of a vulnerable adult because his continued contact after the victim said “no” and his grabbing her hand and placing it on his genitals constituted physical force reasonably calculated to cause submission; he knew or reasonably should have known that the victim through a mental deficiency or developmental disability was incapable of appraising the nature of her conduct as several witnesses testified that the victim’s physical characteristics and speech made her disability apparent; and, despite his intoxication, defendant was capable of forming the intent to abuse a vulnerable adult as he appeared coherent and oriented to time and place.
Brown v. State, 2019 WY 102, 450 P.3d 208,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2019).

Evidence sufficient for guilty plea. —

Factual basis for defendant's guilty plea was sufficient where defendant admitted to engaging in oral sex with the victim, and because the victim was under 16 years old, she could not have legally consented under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-304(a)(i) (repealed). Hirsch v. State, 2006 WY 66, 135 P.3d 586,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2006).

Court adequately considered probation. —

Court adequately considered and did not err in rejecting the option of placing defendant on probation after his guilty plea to two counts of third-degree sexual assault because, in its written judgment, the court stated that it found that probation was inappropriate, the issue of probation was also brought to the attention of the district court by witnesses who testified on defendant's behalf, and the PSI discussed probation as a sentencing option and provided a detailed probation plan. Monjaras v. State, 2006 WY 71, 136 P.3d 162,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2006).

Sex offender registration. —

Potential sex offender registrant's duty to register was improperly terminated under a 10-year provision because he pled guilty to fourth degree sexual assault, which was akin to third degree sexual assault, an offense to which a 25-year termination provision applied; moreover, the state did not waive its right to appeal the termination decision by failing to attend two hearings.
Office of the AG, Division of
Criminal Investigation v. Thomason, 2008 WY 143, 197 P.3d 144,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 2008).

Construction with other law. —

Elements of sexual assault in the third degree are the same as the elements of sexual assault in the fourth degree.
Office of the AG, Division of
Criminal Investigation v. Thomason, 2008 WY 143, 197 P.3d 144,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 2008).

Applied

in

In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984); Lee v. State, 2001 WY 129, 36 P.3d 1133,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 2001); Duke v. State, 2009 WY 74, 209 P.3d 563,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(June 3, 2009).

Quoted

in

Chapman v. State, 2001 WY 25, 18 P.3d 1164,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2001); Misenheimer v. State, 2001 WY 65, 27 P.3d 273,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2001); Giles v. State, 2004 WY 101, 96 P.3d 1027,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(2004); Rutti v. State, 2004 WY 133, 100 P.3d 394,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(2004); Rogers v. State, 2008 WY 90, 189 P.3d 265,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(July 31, 2008); Garza v. State, 2010 WY 64, 231 P.3d 884,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(May 19, 2010).

Cited

in

Betzle v. State, 847 P.2d 1010,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1993); Mehring v. State, 860 P.2d 1101,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1993); James v. State, 998 P.2d 389,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2000); Heinemann v. State, 12 P.3d 692,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 2000); Seward v. State, 2003 WY 116, 76 P.3d 805,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2003); McCard v. State, 2003 WY 142, 78 P.3d 1040,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2003); Wilkins v. State, 2005 WY 2, 104 P.3d 85,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(2005); Miller v. State, 2006 WY 92, 138 P.3d 688,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(2006); Jackson v. State, 2012 WY 56, 273 P.3d 1105,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Apr. 11, 2012).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Use of Videotaping to Avoid Traumatization of Child Sexual Abuse Victim-Witnesses,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 565 (1986).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statute defining crime of rape to include activity traditionally punishable as sodomy or the like, 3 ALR4th 1009.

Statute protecting minors in a specified age range from rape or other sexual activity as applicable to defendant minor within protected age group, 18 ALR5th 856.

Mistake or lack of information as to victim's age as defense to statutory rape, 46 ALR5th 499.

§ 6-2-305.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 135, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3, related to sexual assault in the fourth degree.

Prospective operation. —

Laws 1997, ch. 135, § 3, provides: “This act does not apply to crimes committed prior to the effective date of this act. Prosecutions for a crime shall be governed by the law in effect on the date when the crime occurred. A crime was committed prior to the effective date of this act if any of the elements of the crime occurred prior to the effective date of this act.”

Laws 1997, ch. 135, § 4, makes the act effective on July 1, 1997.

§ 6-2-306.
Penalties for sexual assault.

An actor convicted of sexual assault under W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

who does not qualify under the criteria of subsection (b) or (d) of this section shall be punished as follows:

Sexual assault in the first degree under W.S.

6-2-302

is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than five (5) years nor more than fifty (50) years;

Sexual assault in the second degree under W.S.

6-2-303

is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than two (2) years nor more than twenty (20) years;

Sexual assault in the third degree under W.S.

6-2-304

is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than fifteen (15) years;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 135, § 2.

An actor who is convicted of sexual assault under W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

, who has previously been convicted of any crime containing the same or similar elements as the crimes defined in W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

and who does not qualify under the criteria of subsection (d) of this section shall be punished as follows:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 3.

Sexual assault in the first or second degree under W.S. 6-2-302 or

6-2-303

is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than twenty-five (25) years or for life; or

Sexual assault in the third degree under W.S. 6-2-304 is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 3.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 135, § 2.

An actor who is convicted of sexual assault under W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

, or sexual abuse of a minor under W.S.

6-2-316

through

6-2-317

, shall be punished by life imprisonment without parole if the actor has two (2) or more previous convictions for any of the following designated offenses, which convictions resulted from charges separately brought and which arose out of separate occurrences in this state or elsewhere and which convictions were for offenses committed after the actor reached the age of eighteen (18) years of age:

A crime defined in W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

or a criminal statute from another jurisdiction containing the same or similar elements as a crime defined by W.S. 6-2-302 through 6-2-304.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 135, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 3.

An actor who is convicted of sexual abuse of a minor under W.S.

6-2-314

or

6-2-315

shall be punished by life imprisonment without parole if the actor has one (1) or more previous convictions for a violation of W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

,

6-2-314

or

6-2-315

, or a criminal statute containing the same or similar elements as the crimes defined by W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

, 6-2-314 or 6-2-315, which convictions resulted from charges separately brought and which arose out of separate occurrences in this state or elsewhere and which convictions were for offenses committed after the actor reached the age of eighteen (18) years of age.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1996, ch. 73, § 2; 1997, ch. 135, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 159, §§ 2, 3; 2013 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former (b)(i) through (b)(ii), (c) intro through (c)(ii) and (d)(iii), which pertained to penalties of an actor who does not qualify under the criteria of subsection (d) and penalties of an actor who does qualify under the criteria of subsection (b); added (e); in (a), inserted the internal references, and inserted “less than two (2) years nor” in (ii); in (b), rewrote the introductory language in part, inserting internal references, and inserted (iii) and (iv); in (d), inserted “under W.S. 6 2 302 through 6 2 304, or sexual abuse of a minor under W.S. 6 2 316 through 6 2 317” in the introductory language, and inserted “from another jurisdiction” in (i); added (e); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, added “and which convictions were for offenses committed after the actor reached the age of eighteen (18) years of age” at the end of (d) and (e).

Constitutionality of life sentence for repeat sex offender.
—

Defendant
was not subjected to cruel and/or unusual punishment, under the United
States and Wyoming Constitutions, when defendant was sentenced to
life in prison without the possibility of parole, upon defendant's
second conviction for sexual abuse of a minor. Norgaard v. State, 2014 WY 157, 339 P.3d 267,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2014).

Legislative intent of section. —

The language of this section reflects an intention to establish minimum and maximum incarceration limits under designated conditions and to enact a form of a habitual criminal act. Stambaugh v. State, 613 P.2d 1237,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1980).

The plain language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-306(b)(i) (repealed) only speaks in terms of “being sentenced for two or more separate acts of sexual assault in the second degree”; there is no requirement that the convictions be “previous,” as is the case with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-10-201

, the habitual criminal statute, and the legislative intent is clear that a defendant who is being sentenced for two or more separate acts of sexual assault in the second degree may be sentenced to a life sentence for each separate act. DeLoge v. State, 2002 WY 155, 55 P.3d 1233,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2002).

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-306

does not impermissibly allow the trial court, rather than the jury, to make findings of fact as to whether the enhanced sentence allowed by statute should be imposed. The existence of a prior conviction and the existence of a contemporaneous conviction are viewed as resting on the same quality of evidence and neither is required to be determined by a jury under the beyond-a-reasonable-doubt standard, unless the applicable statute, by its wording, imposes such a requirement. Brown v. State, 2004 WY 119, 99 P.3d 489,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. Nov. 16, 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 966, 125 S. Ct. 1743, 161 L. Ed. 2d 612, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3057 (U.S. 2005).

Double jeopardy claim res judicata. —

Motion to correct illegal sentence under Wyo. R. Crim. P. 35(a) was properly denied because appellant's constitutional claims, including one that this section violated double jeopardy, were res judicata as they had either been decided or should have been raised on a prior direct appeal. The fact that this section was amended in 2007 did not change the nature of appellant's double jeopardy claim, which had been decided against him on direct appeal.
Deloge v. State, 2012 WY 128,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. P-12).

Court may consider probation for third-degree sexual assault,

even though a mandatory sentence is prescribed. Sanchez v. State, 592 P.2d 1130,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1979).

Ten-to-12 year sentence for first-degree sexual assault did not constitute error of law,

as it was within the statutory parameters, and did not exceed the bounds of reason under the circumstances. Seeley v. State, 715 P.2d 232,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 503

(Wyo. 1986).

Proper sentence imposed where defendant abused his developmentally delayed foster daughter. —

In defendant's sexual assault case, a court's sentence was proper where the sentence imposed was entirely consistent with the crime, its attendant circumstances, and his character. Defendant ignored the position of trust he held with the victim, his developmentally delayed foster daughter, and he subsequently abused that position, and as the victim's foster parent and guardian, defendant did not take any responsibility for his actions and their harmful effects on a particularly vulnerable victim, nor did he express any remorse. Watters v. State, 2004 WY 155, 101 P.3d 908,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 2004).

Sentence was lenient. —

Defendant's sentence on two counts of third-degree sexual assault of two concurrent prison terms of 4 to 5 years was upheld as remarkably lenient, where defendant admitted to engaging in a sexual relationship with two 14-year-old girls, had used his position as a teacher to establish a trusting relationship with them and then sexually abused them; fact that he had escaped detection for over 30 years did not diminish in any way his heinous criminal conduct. Monjaras v. State, 2006 WY 71, 136 P.3d 162,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2006).

Consolidated sentence for 2 counts of sexual assault inappropriate. —

A single, consolidated sentence for conviction of two counts of sexual assault is inappropriate. Stambaugh v. State, 613 P.2d 1237,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1980).

Consecutive life sentences. —

In a sexual assault case, defendant was properly sentenced to two consecutive life sentences where defendant subjected the victim to both vaginal and anal sexual penetration, as the acts constituted separate, forcible sexual intrusions on the victim, and, in light of the legislative goal of halting recidivism, the sentences were proper. Daniel v. State, 2003 WY 132, 78 P.3d 205,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1205, 124 S. Ct. 1476, 158 L. Ed. 2d 127, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 1455 (U.S. 2004).

Sentence enhancement. —

Attempted first-degree sexual assault is a qualifying prior offense for purposes of sentence enhancement under subsection (d). Heinemann v. State, 12 P.3d 692,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 2000), cert. denied, 532 U.S. 934, 121 S. Ct. 1386, 149 L. Ed. 2d 310, 2001 U.S. LEXIS 2396 (U.S. 2001).

Notice to the defendant that the state would seek an enhanced sentence is not required under the statute. Heinemann v. State, 12 P.3d 692,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 2000), cert. denied, 532 U.S. 934, 121 S. Ct. 1386, 149 L. Ed. 2d 310, 2001 U.S. LEXIS 2396 (U.S. 2001).

District court did not abuse its discretion in sentencing defendant to serve six consecutive prison sentences of 30 years to life and properly applied the enhancement provisions where the defendant committed six counts of sexual assault against his two daughters over a period of time from when the daughters were approximately four years of age until their late teenage years; defendant's crimes were so egregious that the relative lengths of his sentences were not extreme. Blakeman v. State, 2002 WY 177, 59 P.3d 140,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 2002).

Sentence within range. —

Defendant's combined prison sentence of 21 to 27 years for two counts of second-degree sexual assault of a child was not improper because the sentence was well within the range proscribed by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-306(c)(i).
Garza v. State, 2010 WY 64, 231 P.3d 884,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2010).

Multiple assaults by defendant supported greater sentence than co-defendant. —

The defendant and his co-defendant were both found guilty of one count of sexual assault in the first degree, but the co-defendant only assaulted the victim once, while the defendant assaulted her twice. The record also demonstrated that it was the defendant who actually applied the significant force in bringing about the sexual assault, so the culpability of the two defendants was different. These factors rationally supported the imposition of a 20 to 25 year sentence, less than half the maximum term of 50 years, for a first conviction of a violent felony, even though the co-defendant received a lesser sentence, and demonstrated that the trial court did not impose a longer sentence on the defendant simply because of his race. Carey v. State, 715 P.2d 244,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 502

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 479 U.S. 882, 107 S. Ct. 270, 93 L. Ed. 2d 247, 1986 U.S. LEXIS 4218 (U.S. 1986).

Illegal sentence. —

In defendant's third degree sexual assault case, sentence of not less than ten nor more than fifteen years was illegal, because the crime occurred between April 1, 1994, and October 1, 1996, and at that time, this section carried a maximum penalty of not more than five years. Wease v. State, 2007 WY 176, 170 P.3d 94,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 2007).

Increased penalty due to amendment. —

A guilty plea which included a time frame for the commission of sexual assaults on a minor after July 1, 1997, the effective date of the amendment increasing the maximum penalty from five to 15 years, justified the imposition of the new increased sentence. Lee v. State, 2001 WY 129, 36 P.3d 1133,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 2001), cert. denied, 535 U.S. 1103, 122 S. Ct. 2307, 152 L. Ed. 2d 1062, 2002 U.S. LEXIS 3947 (U.S. 2002).

Confinement in state psychiatric hospital. —

Court did not have jurisdiction to sentence defendant to state psychiatric hospital as part of his sentence under this section. Sanchez v. State, 982 P.2d 149,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 528 U.S. 978, 120 S. Ct. 431, 145 L. Ed. 2d 337, 1999 U.S. LEXIS 7299 (U.S. 1999).

Standard of review. —

Absent due process defects, sentences imposed by the court that fall within the statutory limits will not be disturbed on appeal. Mehring v. State, 860 P.2d 1101,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1993).

Resentencing required. —

Case was remanded for resentencing because sentence of imprisonment for three to seven years was not permissible under law in effect at time of offense. Crawford v. State, 2 P.3d 1055,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2000).

Applied

in

Hamill v. State, 602 P.2d 1212,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 483

(Wyo. 1979); Young v. State, 678 P.2d 880,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 272

(Wyo. 1984); Capwell v. State, 686 P.2d 1148,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 322

(Wyo. 1984); Martin v. State, 720 P.2d 894,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 570

(Wyo. 1986); Crain v. State, 2009 WY 128, 218 P.3d 934,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Oct. 22, 2009).

Quoted

in

Herdt v. State, 816 P.2d 1299,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1991); Frenzel v. State, 938 P.2d 867,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1997); Misenheimer v. State, 2001 WY 65, 27 P.3d 273,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2001); Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Stated

in

Haight v. State, 654 P.2d 1232,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1982); Crawford v. State, 701 P.2d 1150,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 497

(Wyo. 1985); Cardenas v. State, 925 P.2d 239,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1996); McGarvey v. State, 2014 WY 66,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(May 28, 2014).

Cited

in

Freeze v. State, 662 P.2d 415,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1983); Schmidt v. State, 668 P.2d 656,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 356

(Wyo. 1983); Griswold v. State, 994 P.2d 920,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1999); Messer v. State, 2004 WY 98, 96 P.3d 12,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(2004); Mercer v. State, 2012 WY 54, 273 P.3d 1100,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Apr. 11, 2012); Nicodemus v. Lampert, 2014 WY 135,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Oct. 30, 2014); Reifer v. State, 2014 WY 139,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Nov. 5, 2014); Hamilton v. State, 2017 WY 72, 396 P.3d 1009,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

For comment, “Victim Compensation and Restitution: Legislative Alternatives,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 681 (1985).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Standard of proof required under statute providing for commitment of sexual offenders or sexual psychopaths, 96 ALR3d 840.

Validity and construction of statute defining crime of rape to include activity traditionally punishable as sodomy or the like, 3 ALR4th 1009.

§ 6-2-307.
Evidence of marriage as defense.

The fact that the actor and the victim are married to each other is not by itself a defense to a violation of W.S. 6-2-302(a)(i), (ii) or (iii) or 6-2-303(a)(i), (ii), (iii), (vi) or (vii).

Consent of the victim is not a defense to a violation of W.S. 6-2-303(a)(vii) or 6-2-304(a)(iii).

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2007, ch. 7, § 1; 2009, ch. 87, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (b).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “or (vii)” in (a); added “or 6-2-304(a)(iii)” in (b).

Phrase “not by itself a defense” is not vague

because no objective standard is provided by which a person can measure contemplated conduct, because the standard by which conduct is to be measured is clearly outlined in § 6-2-302(a)(i). This section clearly puts an assailant on notice that marriage to the victim of a sexual assault is not a complete defense, but may be considered along with other evidence in deciding the guilt of the defendant. Shunn v. State, 742 P.2d 775,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 508

(Wyo. 1987).

Common-law spousal exception removed. —

When the legislature enacted this section and repealed the statutory spousal exception allowed by the 1977 statutes, it removed the common-law spousal exception to rape in Wyoming. Shunn v. State, 742 P.2d 775,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 508

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

Vasquez v. State, 623 P.2d 1205,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal responsibility of husband for rape, or assault to commit rape, on wife, 24 ALR4th 105.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice § 64.21 (Matthew Bender).